Utah statutes.
75-3-814.   Encumbered assets.
If any assets of the estate are encumbered by mortgage, pledge, lien, or other
security interest, the personal representative may pay the encumbrance or any
part thereof, renew or extend any obligation secured by the encumbrance, or
convey or transfer the assets to the creditor in satisfaction of his lien, in
whole or in part, whether or not the holder of the encumbrance has presented a
claim, if it appears to be for the best interest of the estate. Payment of an
encumbrance does not increase the share of the distributee entitled to the
encumbered assets unless the distributee is entitled to exoneration.
